Idaho statutes. Title 49 MOTOR VEHICLES
Chapter 28
MOTOR VEHICLE SERVICE CONTRACTS

Sec.

§ 49-2801. Short title

Scope. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2018, ch. 116, § 1, effective July 1, 2018. For present comparable provisions, see§§ 41-6201 and 41-6202.

§ 49-2802. Definitions. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2018, ch. 116, § 1, effective July 1, 2018. For present comparable provisions, see§ 41-6203.

§ 49-2803. Service contract reimbursement policy requirements. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2018, ch. 116, § 1, effective July 1, 2018. For present comparable provisions, see§ 41-6204.

§ 49-2804. Motor vehicle service contract provisions. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2018, ch. 116, § 1, effective July 1, 2018. For present comparable provisions, see§ 41-6205.

§ 49-2805. Motor vehicle service contract requirements. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2018, ch. 116, § 1, effective July 1, 2018. For present comparable provisions, see§ 41-6206.

§ 49-2805A. Deceptive solicitation of motor vehicle service contracts prohibited

Penalties. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2018, ch. 116, § 1, effective July 1, 2018. For present comparable provisions, see§ 41-6201 et seq.

§ 49-2806. Prohibited acts. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2018, ch. 116, § 1, effective July 1, 2018. For present comparable provisions, see§ 41-6207.

§ 49-2807. Recordkeeping requirements. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2018, ch. 116, § 1, effective July 1, 2018. For present comparable provisions, see§ 41-6208.

§ 49-2808. Registration of motor vehicle service contract providers. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2002, ch. 299, § 3, effective July 1, 2002.

§ 49-2809. Licensing. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2018, ch. 116, § 1, effective July 1, 2018. For present comparable provisions, see§ 41-6209.

§ 49-2810. Guaranty. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2018, ch. 116, § 1, effective July 1, 2018. For present comparable provisions, see§ 41-6210.

§ 49-2811. Enforcement by attorney general. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2018, ch. 116, § 1, effective July 1, 2018. For present comparable provisions, see§ 41-6211.